bg-BG: Съдържание на комплект с пластилин и моделираща маса: Аксесоари/фигурки; Само смес; Формички за изрязване; Екструдер; Ръководство с инструкции/идеи; Добавки (брокат/мъниста от пяна); Форми; Преса/печат; Точилка; Подложки за форми; Контейнер за съхранение; Инструменти; Друго
de: Inhalt des Spielknete- und Knetmassen-Sets: Zubehör/Figuren; Nur Masse; Ausstecher; Knetpresse; Anleitung/Ideengeber; Mix-Ins (Glitzer/Schaumstoffperlen); Förmchen; Presse/Stempel; Nudelholz; Formmatten; Aufbewahrungsbehälter; Werkzeuge; Sonstige
fi: Muovailumassapakkauksen sisältö: Tarvikkeet/hahmot; Vain massa; Leikkurit; Puristin; Ohje-/ideaopas; Sekoitteet (kimalle/vaahtomuovihelmet); Muotit; Puristin/leimasin; Kaulin; Muotoilualustat; Säilytysrasia; Työkalut; Muu
ru: Состав набора для лепки из пластилина и массы: Аксессуары/фигурки; Только масса для лепки; Резаки; Экструдер; Инструкция/руководство с идеями; Добавки (блестки/пенопластовые шарики); Формочки; Пресс/штамп; Скалка; Коврики с формами; Контейнер для хранения; Инструменты; Другое
it: Contenuto del kit per plastilina e mastice: Accessori/statuine; Solo pasta/plastilina; Formine; Estrusore; Guida con istruzioni/idee; Da mescolare (glitter/perline in schiuma); Stampini; Pressa/timbro; Mattarello; Tovagliette per forme; Contenitore; Strumenti; Altro
da: Indhold af trylledejs- og modellervokssæt: Tilbehør/figurer; Kun masse; Udstikkere; Presse; Vejledning/ide-guide; Tilbehør til at blande i (glimmer/skumperler); Forme; Tryk/stempel; Kagerulle; Formmåtter; Opbevaringsbeholder; Værktøj; Andet
pt-PT: Conteúdo do kit de plasticina e massa de modelar: Acessórios/figuras; Apenas plasticina; Cortadores; Extrusora; Guia de instruções/ideias; Misturas (purpurinas/contas de espuma); Moldes; Prensa/carimbo; Rolo da massa; Tapetes de formas; Recipiente de armazenamento; Ferramentas; Outro
zh-CN: 彩泥和油泥套装内容: 配件/公仔; 仅含彩泥; 切割器; 挤压器; 教程/创意指南; 混合物（闪粉/泡沫珠）; 模具; 压膜器/印章; 擀面杖; 形状垫; 储物盒; 工具; 其他
hr-HR: Sadržaj kompleta za plastelin i git: Dodaci/figurice; Samo smjesa; Izrezivači; Alat za istiskivanje; Upute / vodič za ideje; Dodaci za miješanje (šljokice / pjenaste kuglice); Kalupi; Preša/pečat; Valjak; Podloge s oblicima; Spremnik za pohranu; Alati; Ostalo
ja: 粘土遊び用の粘土＆パテキットの内容: アクセサリー/フィギュア; 粘土/パテのみ; カッター; 押し出し機; 説明書/アイデアガイド; 混ぜ込み素材 (グリッター/発泡ビーズ); 型; プレス/スタンプ; めん棒; シェイプマット; 収納コンテナ; ツール; その他
fr: Contenu du kit de pâte à modeler et de pâte malléable: Accessoires/figurines; Pâte seule; Emporte-pièces; Extrudeuse; Guide d’instructions/idées; Éléments à incorporer (paillettes/billes en mousse); Moules; Presse/tampon; Rouleau; Tapis de formes; Boîte de rangement; Outils; Autre
hu: Gyurma- és gyurmaanyag-készlet tartalma: Kiegészítők/figurák; Csak gyurma/massza; Kiszúrók; Kinyomó; Útmutató/ötletfüzet; Keverékanyagok (csillám/habszivacs gyöngyök); Formák; Prés/nyomda; Sodrófa; Formázó alátétek; Tárolódoboz; Eszközök; Egyéb
zh-TW: 遊戲黏土和油灰套件內容: 配件/公仔; 僅黏土; 裁切工具; 擠壓器; 說明書/創意指南; 混入物 (亮片/泡棉珠); 模具; 壓模/印章; 擀麵棍; 造型墊; 收納盒; 工具; 其他
el: Περιεχόμενα σετ πλαστελίνης και πάστας: Αξεσουάρ/φιγούρες; Μόνο μείγμα; Κόφτες; Εργαλείο εξώθησης; Οδηγός με οδηγίες/ιδέες; Πρόσθετα (γκλίτερ/αφρώδεις χάντρες); Καλούπια; Πρέσα/σφραγίδα; Πλάστης; Επιφάνειες με σχήματα; Δοχείο αποθήκευσης; Εργαλεία; Άλλο
pt-BR: Massinha de modelar & putty kit conteúdo: Acessórios/figuras; Apenas massa; Cortadores; Extrusora; Guia de instruções/ideias; Complementos para misturar (glitter/bolinhas de espuma); Moldes; Prensa/carimbo; Rolo; Tapetes de moldar; Recipiente de armazenamento; Ferramentas; Outro
cs: Obsah sady s modelínou a chytrou modelínou: Doplňky/figurky; Pouze hmota; Vykrajovátka; Lis; Návod / kniha nápadů; Příměsi (třpytky / pěnové kuličky); Formičky; Lis/razítko; Váleček; Tvarovací podložky; Skladovací kontejner; Nástroje; Jiné
pl: Zawartość zestawu ciastoliny i masy plastycznej: Akcesoria/figurki; Tylko masa; Wykrawacze; Wyciskarka; Instrukcja/przewodnik po pomysłach; Dodatki (brokat/koraliki z pianki); Formy; Praska/stempel; Wałek; Szablony; Pojemnik; Narzędzia; Inne
th: เล่นแป้ง & ฉาบ ติดตามเนื้อหา: อุปกรณ์เสริม/ฟิกเกอร์; ดินปั้น/พัตตี้เท่านั้น; ที่ตัด; กระบอกฉีด; คู่มือคำแนะนำ/ไอเดีย; ของตกแต่งผสม (กลิตเตอร์/เม็ดโฟม); แม่พิมพ์; ที่กด/ที่ปั๊ม; ไม้นวดแป้ง; แผ่นรองปั้นรูปทรง; กล่องจัดเก็บ; เครื่องมือ; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Obsah súpravy plastelíny a modelovacích hmôt: Doplnky/figúrky; Iba hmota; Vykrajovačky; Vytláčadlo; Návod/príručka s nápadmi; Prímesi (trblietky/penové guľôčky); Formičky; Lis/pečiatka; Valček; Podložky s tvarmi; Úložný kontajner; Nástroje; Iné
nl: Speelklei- en puttyset inhoud: Accessoires/beeldjes; Alleen boetseermassa; Uitsteekvormpjes; Kleipers; Instructie-/ideeëngids; Toevoegingen (glitter/schuimballetjes); Vormpjes; Pers/stempel; Deegroller; Vormmatten; Opbergbakje; Gereedschap; Overig
ko: 플레이 도우 및 퍼티 키트 구성품: 액세서리/피규어; 혼합물만; 커터; 압출기; 설명서/아이디어 가이드; 믹스인(글리터/폼 비즈); 몰드; 프레스/스탬퍼; 밀대; 셰이프 매트; 보관 컨테이너; 도구; 기타
es: Contenido del kit de plastilina y masilla: Accesorios/figuras; Solo masa; Cortadores; Extrusor; Guía de instrucciones/ideas; Complementos (brillantina/cuentas de espuma); Moldes; Prensa/sellos; Rodillo; Plantillas de formas; Contenedor de almacenamiento; Herramientas; Otro
ro-RO: Conținutul kitului de plastilină și pastă modelatoare: Accesorii/figurine; Doar pastă; Forme de tăiat; Extruder; Ghid de instrucțiuni/idei; Adaosuri (sclipici/mărgele de spumă); Forme; Presă/ștampilă; Făcăleț; Covorașe cu forme; Recipient de depozitare; Instrumente; Altele
en: Play dough & putty kit contents: Accessories/figurines; Compound only; Cutters; Extruder; Instruction/idea guide; Mix-ins (glitter/foam beads); Molds; Press/stamper; Rolling pin; Shape mats; Storage container; Tools; Other
sv: Innehåll i lekdegssats: Tillbehör/figurer; Endast lera/massa; Stansar; Lerspruta; Instruktions-/idéguide; Extramaterial (glitter/skumpärlor); Formar; Press/stämpel; Kavel; Formunderlägg; Förvaringsburk; Verktyg; Övrigt
tr: Oyun hamuru ve macun kit içeriği: Aksesuarlar/figürler; Yalnızca hamur/macun; Kesiciler; Ekstrüder; Talimat/fikir kılavuzu; Karışımlar (sim/köpük boncuklar); Kalıplar; Pres/damga; Merdane; Şekil matları; Saklama kabı; Aletler; Diğer
sl-SI: Vsebina kompleta plastelina in mase za oblikovanje: Dodatki/figurice; Samo masa; Modelčki za izrezovanje; Stiskalnica; Navodila/priročnik z idejami; Dodatki (bleščice/penaste kroglice); Modelčki; Stiskalnica/štampiljka; Valjar; Podlage z oblikami; Posoda za shranjevanje; Orodja; Drugo
vi: Nội dung bộ đồ chơi bột nặn và đất sét: Phụ kiện/tượng nhỏ; Chỉ có bột/đất nặn; Khuôn cắt; Khuôn ép; Sách hướng dẫn/ý tưởng; Đồ trộn thêm (kim tuyến/hạt xốp); Khuôn; Máy ép/con dấu; Cây lăn bột; Thảm tạo hình; Hộp đựng; Dụng cụ; Khác
nb: Play dough- og kittsettinnhold: Tilbehør/figurer; Kun masse; Utstikkere; Presse; Instruksjons-/idéveiledning; Innblandinger (glitter/skumperler); Former; Presse/stempel; Kjevle; Formmatter; Oppbevaringsbeholder; Verktøy; Annet
lt-LT: Plastilino ir glaisto rinkinio turinys: Priedai / figurėlės; Tik masė; Pjaustyklės; Išspaudimo įrankis; Instrukcijų / idėjų vadovas; Įmaišomi priedai (blizgučiai / putplasčio rutuliukai); Formelės; Presas / spaudas; Kočėlas; Formų kilimėliai; Laikymo indas; Įrankiai; Kita